Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-392
Murder of an unborn child in the second degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits murder of an unborn child in the second degree if he or she, in committing an act or engaging in conduct that causes the death of an unborn child, intends, but without premeditation, to kill the unborn child or another.

(2) Murder of an unborn child in the second degree is a Class IB felony.

Laws 2002, LB 824, § 6.